Missouri, session 2026, SB1795.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 208 and 376, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
208.1450, 376.1194, and 376.1195, to read as follows:
208.1450. 1. The MO HealthNet program shall cover
biomarker testing for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of a
participant's disease or condition to guide treatment
decisions when the test provides clinical utility to the
patient as demonstrated by medical and scientific evidence,
including, but not limited to:
(1) Labeled indications for a test approved or cleared
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or indicated
tests for an FDA approved drug;
(2) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
national coverage determinations or Medicare administrative
contractor local coverage determinations; or
(3) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines.
2. MO HealthNet managed care organizations contracted
to deliver services to participants shall provide biomarker

SB 1795 2
testing at the same scope, duration, and frequency as MO
HealthNet otherwise provides to participants.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require coverage of biomarker testing for screening purposes.
4. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Biomarker", a defined characteristic that is
measured as an indicator of normal biological processes,
pathogenic processes, or responses to an exposure or
intervention, including therapeutic interventions.
Molecular, histologic, radiographic, or physiologic
characteristics are types of biomarkers. A biomarker is not
an assessment of how a patient feels, functions, or survives;
(2) "Biomarker testing", the analysis of a patient's
tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for the presence of a
biomarker. Biomarker testing includes, but is not limited
to, single-analyte tests and multi-plex panel tests
performed at a participating in-network laboratory facility
that is either CLIA certified or CLIA waived by the federal
Food and Drug Administration.
376.1194. For purposes of this section and section
376.1195, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Biomarker", a defined characteristic that is
measured as an indicator of normal biological processes,
pathogenic processes, or responses to an exposure or
intervention, including therapeutic interventions.
Molecular, histologic, radiographic, or physiologic
characteristics are types of biomarkers. A biomarker is not
an assessment of how a patient feels, functions, or survives;
(2) "Biomarker testing", the analysis of a patient's
tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for the presence of a
biomarker. Biomarker testing includes, but is not limited

SB 1795 3
to, single-analyte tests and multi-plex panel tests
performed at a participating in-network laboratory facility
that is either CLIA certified or CLIA waived by the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration;
(3) "Clinical utility", the test result provides
information that is used in the formulation of a treatment
or monitoring strategy that informs a patient's outcome and
impacts the clinical decision;
(4) "Nationally recognized clinical practice
guidelines", evidence-based clinical practice guidelines
developed by independent organizations or medical
professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology
and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest
policy. Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of
care informed by a systematic review of evidence and an
assessment of the benefits and costs of alternative care
options and include recommendations intended to optimize
patient care.
376.1195. 1. Health insurers, nonprofit health
service plans, and health maintenance organizations issuing,
amending, delivering, or renewing a health insurance
contract on or after August 28, 2026, shall include coverage
for biomarker testing for the purposes of diagnosis,
treatment, appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of
a covered person's disease or condition to guide treatment
decisions when the test provides clinical utility to the
patient as demonstrated by medical and scientific evidence,
including, but not limited to:
(1) Labeled indications for a test approved or cleared
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration or indicated tests
for an FDA approved drug;

SB 1795 4
(2) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
national coverage determinations or Medicare administrative
contractor local coverage determinations; or
(3) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines.
2. Such coverage shall be provided in a manner that
shall limit disruptions in care including the need for
multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples.
3. The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have
access to a clear, readily accessible, and convenient
process to request an exception to a coverage policy
provided pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such
process shall be made readily accessible on the health
insurer's, nonprofit health service plan's, or health
maintenance organization's website.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require coverage of biomarker testing for screening purposes.
5. The department of commerce and insurance shall
adopt rules as necessary to effectuate the provisions of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓